Utah statutes.
63J-5-204.   Legislative review and approval of certain new federal funds
requests.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "High impact federal funds request" means a new federal funds request
that will or could:
(i)  result in the state receiving total payments of $10,000,000 or more per
year from the federal government;
(ii)  require the state to add 11 or more permanent full-time employees, 11 or
more permanent part-time employees, or combination of permanent full-time and
permanent part-time employees equal to 11 or more in order to receive the new
federal funds or participate in the new federal program; or
(iii)  require the state to expend more than $1,000,000 of new state monies in
a fiscal year in order to receive or administer the new federal funds or
participate in the new federal program.
(b)  "Medium impact federal funds request" means a new federal funds request
that will or could:
(i)  result in the state receiving total payments of more than $1,000,000 but
less than $10,000,000 per year from the federal government;
(ii)  require the state to add more than zero but less than 11 permanent full-
time employees, more than zero but less than 11 permanent part-time employees,
or a combination of permanent full-time employees and permanent part-time
employees equal to more than zero but less than 11 in order to receive or
administer the new federal funds or participate in the new federal program; or
(iii)  require the state to expend $1 to $1,000,000 of new state monies in a
fiscal year in order to receive or administer the new federal funds or
participate in the new federal program.
(2) (a)  Before obligating the state to accept or receive new federal funds or
to participate in a new federal program under a medium impact federal funds
request, and no later than three months after submitting a medium impact
federal funds request, and, where possible, before formally submitting the
medium impact federal funds request, an agency shall:
(i)  submit the federal funds request summary to the governor or the Judicial
Council, as appropriate, for approval or rejection; and
(ii)  if the governor or Judicial Council approves the new federal funds
request, submit the federal funds request summary to the Legislative Executive
Appropriations Committee for its review and recommendations.
(b)  The Legislative Executive Appropriations Committee shall review the
federal funds request summary and may:
(i)  recommend that the agency accept the new federal funds;
(ii)  recommend that the agency not accept the new federal funds; or
(iii)  recommend to the governor that the governor call a special session of
the Legislature to review and approve or reject the acceptance of the new
federal funds.
(3) (a)  Before obligating the state to accept or receive new federal funds or
to participate in a new federal program under a high impact federal funds
request, and no later than three months after submitting a high impact federal
funds request, and, where possible, before formally submitting the high impact
federal funds request, an agency shall:
(i)  submit the federal funds request summary to the governor or Judicial
Council, as appropriate, for approval or rejection; and
(ii)  if the governor or Judicial Council approves the new federal funds
request, submit the federal funds request summary to the Legislature for its
approval or rejection in an annual general session or a special session.
(b) (i)  If the Legislature approves the new federal funds request, the agency
may accept the new federal funds or participate in the new federal program.
(ii)  If the Legislature fails to approve the new federal funds request, the
agency may not accept the new federal funds or participate in the new federal
program.
(c)  If an agency fails to obtain the Legislature's approval under this
Subsection (3):
(i)  the governor or Judicial Council, as appropriate, may require the agency
to withdraw the new federal funds request or refuse or return the new federal
funds;
(ii)  the Legislature may, if federal law allows, opt out or decline to
participate in the new federal program or decline to receive the new federal
funds; or
(iii)  the Legislature may reduce the agency's General Fund appropriation in
an amount less than, equal to, or greater than the amount of federal funds
received by the agency.
